Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-560
Taxes; warrant for collection.

No warrant, other than the warrant of the county clerk issued to the county treasurer under the general revenue law, shall be necessary for the collection of the general taxes levied for such cities.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 49, p. 492;

C.S.1922, § 3675;

C.S.1929, § 14-552;

R.S.1943, § 14-560.

Section is a part of the general scheme of municipal taxation established by 1905 act, and construction given thereto by taxing authorities as requiring levy to be computed on valuation and assessment as returned by county assessor and as equalized for preceding year, should be followed. Chicago & N.W. Ry. Co. v. Bauman, 132 Neb. 67, 271 N.W. 256 (1937).